South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S463.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-21-125 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-21-125. It is unlawful for a person to swim within fifty feet of a public boat landing or public boat ramp located on a lake or reservoir owned or maintained by an investor-owned utility or the South Carolina Public Service Authority.constructed or developed by an investor-owned utility for hydroelectric generation. For purposes of this section, a public boat landing or ramp is one owned or maintained by an investor-owned utility for hydroelectric generation and is available to the public at large. The area where swimming is prohibited must be clearly marked and signs must be posted to give public notice that no swimming is allowed in the area. Watercraft must slow to no wake speed when operated within two hundred feet of the landing or ramp. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----